Rhode Island statutes. Title 41 Sports, Racing, and Athletics
Chapter 3 Horse Racing

41-3-1.
License required for racing.

No person, association, or corporation shall hold or conduct any meeting within the state where horse racing shall be permitted for any stake, purse, or reward, except such person, association, or corporation as shall be licensed by the division of gaming and athletics licensing as provided in this chapter, and after an affirmative vote of the qualified electors as provided in chapter 9 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-1

; P.L. 1981, ch. 233, § 4; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 146.

41-3-2.
Town or city election on establishment of track.

Before a horse racing track shall be established in any town or city, the approval of the question as is required by chapter 9 of this title shall be necessary, and if consent be thus given, all further regulations shall rest with the division of gaming and athletics licensing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 17; P.L. 1952, ch. 3025, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-2

; P.L. 1981, ch. 233, § 1.

41-3-3.
Classes of licenses.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing shall be empowered to license race meets under the following classes:

Class A. Horse running races, so-called.

Class B. Competitive harness horse races that are run in connection with the grand circuit, so-called.

Class C. Competitive harness horse races that are not run in connection with the grand circuit, so-called.

Class D. Competitive horse races where there is no wagering.

Class E. Harness racing by any incorporated association duly authorized to maintain agricultural exhibits.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-3

.

41-3-4.
Application for license — Action by division.

Any person, association, or corporation desiring to conduct horse racing within this state shall apply to the division of gaming and athletics licensing for a license on forms provided by the division. The application shall specify the days on which horse racing is to be conducted, the location of the horse racing, and such other information as may be required by the division.

The division may also require any person, association, or corporation to give information as to financial standing and credit. The division shall have the right to reject any applications for a license for any cause that it may deem sufficient, and the action of the division both as to the license and the date or award shall be final, subject to the right of appeal provided by chapter 2 of this title.

The division shall, as far as practicable, avoid conflicts in the dates assigned or awarded for horse racing in the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1940, ch. 821, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-4

; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 35.

41-3-5.
Award of dates for Class A racing.

The application for a Class A license shall be filed on or before the fifteenth day of February in any year and the division of gaming and athletics licensing having considered the applications, shall on or before the first day of April in any year, assign or award all dates for racing within the state for the current year; provided, however, that the division in its discretion, may receive applications at a later date and may change the assignment or award if, in its judgment, the change is found necessary, but prior to making the change it shall print a public notice in the newspapers and shall give the party aggrieved by the change an opportunity to be heard.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-5

.

41-3-6.
Renewal of Class A licenses.

Class A licenses, when granted, shall be renewable at the option of the licensee for a period of ten (10) years, provided the licensee complies with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 4 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 17; P.L. 1952, ch. 3025, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-6

.

41-3-7.
Rebate of license fees.

If by any reason or cause beyond the control of and through no fault or neglect of any licensee and while the licensee is not in default, it should become impossible or impracticable to conduct horse racing upon any day or days licensed by the division of gaming and athletics licensing, at the request of the licensee and upon sworn statements, submitted in writing by the licensee, the division may rebate all or part of the license fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-7

.

41-3-8.
Licensing of owners, trainers, jockeys, and other personnel.

The division, at its discretion, shall license owners, trainers, jockeys, starters, exercise boys, hotwalkers, grooms, and all other stable personnel as well as pari-mutuel employees, concessioners and vendors, security personnel, licensees, employees, pari-mutuel totalizator companies and their employees, and all employees of race track management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-8

; P.L. 1960, ch. 74, § 18; P.L. 1973, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 308, § 1.

41-3-8.1.
Licensing of concessioners, vendors, pari-mutuel totalizator companies, and employees.

All persons, firms, partnerships, associations, or corporations desiring to operate any concession allied to any horse racing track, shall apply for a license to the division of racing and athletics, on such forms and in such a manner as prescribed by regulations of the division. The division, by regulation, shall establish other occupational licensing for all employees of the concessions, all pari-mutuel employees, and all persons employed in any other capacity by the race track management, and for other persons engaged in racing activities at any horse racing track.

All persons, firms, associations, or corporations employed by the management of a horse racing track in providing pari-mutuel totalizator computer services for pari-mutuel computations, shall apply for a license to the division of racing and athletics upon such forms and in such manner as prescribed by regulations of the division. All employees of the pari-mutuel totalizator computer companies shall be licensed by the division on forms prescribed by regulations of the division.

In determining whether to grant a license pursuant to this section, the division may require the applicant to submit information as to: financial standing and credit; moral character; criminal record, if any; previous employment; corporate, partnership or association affiliations; ownership of personal assets; and such other information as it deems pertinent to the issuance of the license. The division may reject for good cause an application for a license, and it may suspend or revoke for good cause any license issued by it after a hearing held in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42, and subject to further appeal procedures provided by §

41-2-3

.

The issuance of a license and the payment of annual fees shall be in accordance with the following schedule:

Concessionaire and vendors$100 (2) Occupational license: Owners5.00 Trainers5.00 Jockeys5.00 Apprentice jockeys5.00 Authorized agents5.00 Starters5.00 Stable employees5.00 Assumed names10.00 Colors5.00 (3) Vendors and concessionaries’ employees5.00 (4) Pari-mutuel employees5.00 (5) Employees of race track management5.00 (6) Pari-mutuel totalizator company100 (7) Pari-mutuel totalizator company employees5.00

All individual applicants for licensing under this section shall be fingerprinted, and upon obtaining the license, shall wear upon his or her outer apparel a photo identification badge, issued or authorized by the division of gaming and athletics licensing under rules and regulations promulgated by the division.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 308, § 2.

41-3-9.
Rules as to betting and track operation — Deputies.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing may make rules and regulations governing the operation of the tracks and stables. The division may make rules regulating betting at the horse racing events. The division may, at its discretion, appoint deputies, not exceeding twenty-two (22), to perform such duties as the rules and regulations of the division may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-9

; P.L. 1972, ch. 65, § 1.

41-3-9.1.
Admittance in stable enclosure.

No person shall enter the stable enclosure of a licensee of thoroughbred horses kept for a racing meeting without first obtaining the proper photo identification or permission in writing from the designated track security authority.

Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine up to one hundred dollars ($100) or a jail sentence of up to thirty (30) days or both for the first offense, and the second and subsequent offense shall be punishable by a fine up to two hundred ($200) dollars or up to ninety (90) days in jail or both.

This section shall not apply to any police officer or firefighter in the exercise of his or her lawful duty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 150, § 1.

41-3-10.
Accounting methods.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing shall have the power to require that the books and financial or other statements of any person, corporation, or association licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall be kept in any manner that to the division may seem best, and the division shall also be authorized to visit, to investigate, and to place expert accountants and such other persons as it may deem necessary, in the offices, tracks, or places of business of any person, corporation, or association, for the purpose of satisfying itself that the division’s rules and regulations are strictly complied with.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-10

.

41-3-11.
Employees of licensees.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing may at any time for cause require the removal of any employee or official employed by any licensee hereunder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-11

.

41-3-12.
Compelling production of records.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing shall have power to compel the production of any and all books, memoranda, or documents showing the receipts and disbursements of any person, corporation, or association licensed under the provisions of this chapter to conduct race meetings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 7; impl. am P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-12

.

41-3-13.
Witnesses before division.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing shall have power to summon witnesses before it and to administer oaths or affirmations to the witnesses whenever, in the judgment of the division, it may be necessary for the effectual discharge of its duties; and any person failing to appear before the division at the time and place specified in answer to the summons, or refusing to testify, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction in a court of competent jurisdiction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by a sentence to the adult correctional institutions for not more than six (6) months, or by a sentence to both a fine and imprisonment, in the judgment of the court. False swearing on the part of any witnesses shall be deemed perjury, and shall be punished as perjury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-13

.

41-3-14.
Suspension or revocation of license.

Any license granted under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the rules and regulations set forth by the division of gaming and athletics licensing, and shall be subject to suspension or revocation for any cause that the division shall deem sufficient, after giving the licensee a reasonable opportunity for a hearing at which he or she shall have the right to be represented by counsel. If any license is suspended or revoked, the division shall state the reasons for the suspension or revocation and cause an entry of the reasons to be made on the record books of the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-14

.

41-3-15.
Penalty for unauthorized racing.

Any person aiding or abetting in the conduct of any meeting within this state at which racing of horses shall be permitted for any stake, purse, or reward, except in accordance with a license duly issued and unsuspended or un-revoked by the division of gaming and athletics licensing, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each day of the unauthorized meeting or by imprisonment for not exceeding six (6) months, or both a fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 18; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-15

.

41-3-16.
Municipal taxation of tracks.

No fee, tax, or other emolument shall be exacted by any city or town for the use of track or events conducted thereon under the provisions of this chapter, and the right to establish any fees, taxes, or other emoluments shall rest with the division of gaming and athletics licensing in accordance with law; provided, however, that nothing in this chapter or chapter 4 of this title contained shall be construed to prevent any city or town from assessing and collecting taxes upon the real and personal property used by or in connection with any racing track.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 17; P.L. 1952, ch. 3025, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-16

.

41-3-17.
Ejection of undesirable persons — Rights of licensee.

Any licensee under this chapter shall have the right to refuse admission to and to eject from the enclosure of any pari-mutuel facility where a pari-mutuel meeting licensed under the provisions of this chapter, is being held, any person or persons whose presence within the enclosure is, in the sole judgment of the licensee, its agents, or servants, undesirable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 426, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 146.

41-3-18.
Penalty for refusing to leave.

Any person or persons within the enclosure deemed undesirable by the licensee, its agents, or servants or who has been ordered to leave or who has been previously ejected, shall, upon refusal to leave, be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 148, § 1.

41-3-19.
Severability.

The invalidity of any sections or parts of any section or sections of this chapter or chapter 4 of this title shall not affect the validity of the remainder of the chapters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-17

; G.L. 1956, §

41-3-19

, P.L. 1960, ch. 148, § 1.

41-3-20.
Majority of directors of licensee to be residents.

The majority of the membership of the board of directors of any corporation licensed to hold or conduct any meeting within the state where horse racing shall be permitted for any stake, purse, or reward, shall be residents of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 202, § 1.

41-3-21.
Chemical test.

There shall be administered to the first three (3) finishers and to the last finisher of every horse race, the appropriate chemical test authorized by the division of gaming and athletics licensing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 329, § 1.